Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.02.080

Forum selection.

(1) The articles of incorporation or bylaws may contain provisions that require any or all internal corporate proceedings to be commenced and maintained exclusively in any specified court or courts of this state and, if so specified, in any additional courts in this state or in any other jurisdictions with which the corporation has a reasonable relationship.

(2) A provision permitted under subsection (1) of this section:

(a) May not confer jurisdiction on any court, over any person, or of any proceeding; and

(b) May not (i) prohibit commencing or maintaining an internal corporate proceeding in the courts of this state or (ii) require claims asserted in an internal corporate proceeding to be determined by arbitration.

(3) If the court or courts of this state specified in a provision permitted under subsection (1) of this section do not have jurisdiction, but any other court or courts specified in the provision do have jurisdiction, then the internal corporate proceeding may be commenced and maintained:

(a) In any court of this state that has jurisdiction; or

(b) In any other court specified in the provision that has jurisdiction.

(4) If no court specified in a provision permitted under subsection (1) of this section has jurisdiction, then the internal corporate proceeding may be commenced and maintained in any court that has jurisdiction.

(5) For purposes of this section, "internal corporate proceeding" means (a) any proceeding asserting a claim based on a violation of a duty under the laws of this state by a current or former director, officer, or shareholder in such capacity, (b) any proceeding commenced or maintained in the right of the corporation, (c) any proceeding asserting a claim arising pursuant to any provision of the act or the corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws, or (d) any proceeding asserting a claim concerning the internal affairs of the corporation that is not included in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

[ 2017 c 28 s 9.]